Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 4
Criminal Penalties

§ 28-45-401. Willful and knowing violations.

A regulated lender who willfully and knowingly makes charges in excess of those permitted by the chapter on finance charges and related provisions, chapter 42, title 28, Idaho Code, applying to regulated consumer loans is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction may be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or to imprisonment not exceeding one (1) year, or both.

A person who, in violation of the provisions of this act applying to authority to make regulated consumer loans, section 28-46-301, Idaho Code, willfully and knowingly engages in the business of making regulated consumer loans, or of taking assignments of and undertaking direct collection of payments from and enforcement of rights against debtors arising from regulated consumer loans, is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction may be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), or to imprisonment not exceeding one (1) year, or both.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-45-401, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264; am. 2006, ch. 122, § 3, p. 340.

§ 28-45-402. Disclosure violations.

A person is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction may be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or to imprisonment not exceeding one (1) year, or both, if he willfully and knowingly:

Gives false or inaccurate information or fails to provide information which he is required to disclose under the Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act;

Uses any rate table or chart, the use of which is authorized by the provisions of the Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act, in a manner which consistently understates the annual percentage rate determined according to those provisions; or

Otherwise fails to comply with any requirement of the provisions on disclosure of the Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act.

The criminal liability of a person under this section is in lieu of and not in addition to his criminal liability under the Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act; no prosecution of a person with respect to the same violation may be maintained pursuant to both this section and the Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-45-402, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.